District of Columbia statutes.
16-2363

Confidentiality of records.

The provisions of §§ 16-2332 and 16-2333 shall apply to all juvenile case records and juvenile social records as defined therein which are created pursuant to the proceedings under this subchapter.

Sept. 23, 1977, D.C. Law 2-22, title IV, § 410, 24 DCR 3341
Mar. 24, 1998, D.C. Law 12-81, § 10(ll), 45 DCR 745
1973 Ed., § 16-2363.
1981 Ed., § 16-2363.
This section is referenced in § 16-2364.